Idaho statutes. Title 40 HIGHWAYS AND BRIDGES
Chapter 12
BRIDGES

Sec.

§ 40-1201. Interstate bridges on state highways — Maintenance and control.

When interstate bridges are located on designated state highways and designated state highways of any adjoining state, the portions of bridges within the state of Idaho shall be controlled, operated and maintained by the board, which is hereby vested with all power and authority necessary or incidential [incidental] to the maintenance, operation and control of them.

§ 40-1202. Petition for constructing — Notice of hearing.

When the construction of a new bridge, for which the expenditure contemplated will exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), five percent (5%) or twenty-five (25) qualified voters, whichever is greater, of a county highway system or highway district system interested in it may petition the respective commissioners for the erection of the needed bridge. The commissioners shall then advertise the petition, in accordance with the provisions of section 40-206, Idaho Code, giving the location and notify the director of highways to attend at a certain time and place to hear the petition.

§ 40-1203. Petition hearing — Duty of highway commissioners.

On the day fixed to hear the petition, proof of the notice given being made satisfactory, the county or district highway commissioners shall hear the petition, examine witnesses, and determine whether or not a bridge as petitioned for is necessary. If the petition is approved the county or district highway commissioners shall determine the type of bridge to be constructed, prepare plans and specifications, invite bids, let the contract, have the bridge erected, and provide payment for it.

§ 40-1204. Bridges costing over five thousand dollars

Contracts for construction and repair. [Repealed.]

§ 40-1205. Bridges — Reports.

The director of highways shall, in his official reports, give a full account of all bridges for which he has in whole or in part the charge and maintenance and those bridges constructed or repaired, the cost, amounts expended, from what source moneys were derived, and the present and prospective condition of the bridges.

§ 40-1206. Maximum load — Posting of notices.

County or highway commissioners may limit the maximum load to be carried over and on any public bridge over which they have jurisdiction below the limit prescribed by law. In this case, the highway commissioners shall cause suitable signs to be erected and maintained at the approach to the bridge, specifying the limitation of load.

§ 40-1207. Traffic regulations — Posting of notices — Penalty.

Directors of highways, or any other persons legally appointed to take charge of a bridge, may post a notice to set out and provide that no horse or mule-drawn vehicle, nor a person riding a horse or mule shall travel across the bridge or any portion of the bridge faster than at a walk; that horses, mules or cattle shall not be allowed to cross in bunches of more than twenty (20) at a time, and shall not travel faster than at a walk. The notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place and shall be in letters large enough and placed in a manner that it may be easily read by the public. Directors of highways may make other rules and regulations governing the traffic on bridges within their jurisdiction when it is deemed necessary for the safety of the public, and may post a notice of the rules in the manner provided in this section. Any person convicted for violating any of the provisions of a notice as provided for by this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300), or may be imprisoned not less than ten (10) days nor more than sixty (60) days in the county jail, or by both fine and imprisonment.

§ 40-1208 — 40-1210. Penalty for avoiding tolls — Acquisition of toll bridges — Toll bridges costing over $25,000 — Private ownership. [Repealed.]